Washington statutes.
RCW 19.85.061

Compliance with federal law.

Unless so requested by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee under RCW 19.85.030, an agency is not required to comply with this chapter when adopting any rule solely for the purpose of conformity or compliance, or both, with federal statute or regulations. In lieu of the statement required under RCW 19.85.030, the agency shall file a statement citing, with specificity, the federal statute or regulation with which the rule is being adopted to conform or comply, and describing the consequences to the state if the rule is not adopted.

[ 1995 c 403 s 404.]

NOTES:

Application—1995 c 403 ss 201, 301-305, 401-405, and 801: See note following RCW 34.05.328.

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.